Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Transit operators. (a) A person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if (1) the person assaults a transit operator, or intentionally throws or otherwise transfers bodily fluids onto a transit operator; and (2) the transit operator is acting in the course of the operator's duties and is operating a transit vehicle, aboard a transit vehicle, or otherwise responsible for a transit vehicle. A person convicted under this paragraph may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or both. (b) For the purposes of this subdivision, "transit operator" means a driver or operator of a transit vehicle that is used to provide any of the following services: (1) public transportation, as defined in section 174.22, subdivision 7; (2) light rail transit service; (3) special transportation service under section 473.386, whether provided by the Metropolitan Council or by other providers under contract with the council; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (4) commuter rail servicedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (5) transportation in a personal vehicle through a transportation network company under section 65B.472, subdivision 1, paragraph (m). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end